Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1916
Report or work product; no court review.

No report or other work product of an investigation by the Inspector General shall be reviewable in any court. Neither the Inspector General nor any member of the Inspector General's staff shall be required to testify or produce evidence in any judicial or administrative proceeding concerning matters within such person's official cognizance except in a proceeding brought to enforce the Office of Inspector General of the Nebraska Correctional System Act.

Laws 2015, LB598, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2021), § 47-916;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 60.